Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5241
Established geographic service area, defined.

Established geographic service area shall mean a geographic area, as approved by the director and based on the carrier's certificate of authority to transact insurance business in this state, within which the carrier is authorized to provide coverage.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 19.